dev/bm.adj.dix
<pardef n="kvep/pe__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pende</l>     <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pen</l>       <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pet</l>       <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pet</l>       <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="forfr/yse__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>osne</l>      <r>yse<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osne</l>      <r>yse<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ossen</l>     <r>yse<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osset</l>     <r>yse<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osset</l>     <r>yse<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ysende</l>    <r>yse<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sip/pe__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>pa</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pa</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pa</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pa</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pede</l>      <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pede</l>      <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pende</l>     <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pete</l>      <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pete</l>      <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pet</l>       <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pet</l>       <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kr/ype__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>øpen</l>      <r>ype<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øpet</l>      <r>ype<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øpet</l>      <r>ype<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øpne</l>      <r>ype<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øpne</l>      <r>ype<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ypende</l>    <r>ype<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sjokkskad/e__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bli/ve__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>       <r>ve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>       <r>ve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>ve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>ve<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vende</l>     <r>ve<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dik/e__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bleknebbe/t__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tere</l>      <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>teste</l>     <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>test</l>      <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bidige__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="finklippe">       <i>finklip</i><par n="sip/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bidige">          <i>bidige</i><par n="bidige__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dike">            <i>dik</i><par n="dik/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="blive">           <i>bli</i><par n="bli/ve__adj"/></e>
<e lm="beklippe">        <i>beklip</i><par n="sip/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="frase">           <i>fras</i><par n="dik/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dryppe">          <i>dryp</i><par n="sip/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forfryse">        <i>forfr</i><par n="forfr/yse__adj"/></e>
<e lm="avklippe">        <i>avklip</i><par n="sip/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bleknebbet">      <i>bleknebbe</i><par n="bleknebbe/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sippe">           <i>sip</i><par n="sip/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stivfryse">       <i>stivfr</i><par n="forfr/yse__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skamfryse">       <i>skamfr</i><par n="forfr/yse__adj"/></e>
<e lm="snauklippe">      <i>snauklip</i><par n="sip/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vingeklippe">     <i>vingeklip</i><par n="sip/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skamklippe">      <i>skamklip</i><par n="sip/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vengeklippe">     <i>vengeklip</i><par n="sip/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sule">            <i>sul</i><par n="dik/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilfryse">        <i>tilfr</i><par n="forfr/yse__adj"/></e>
<e lm="småfryse">        <i>småfr</i><par n="forfr/yse__adj"/></e>
<e lm="svane">           <i>svan</i><par n="dik/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjokkskade">      <i>sjokkskad</i><par n="sjokkskad/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kortklippe">      <i>kortklip</i><par n="sip/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kippe">           <i>kip</i><par n="sip/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kryssklippe">     <i>kryssklip</i><par n="sip/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="maskinklippe">    <i>maskinklip</i><par n="sip/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="krype">           <i>kr</i><par n="kr/ype__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kveppe">          <i>kvep</i><par n="kvep/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="klippe">          <i>klip</i><par n="sip/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kreppe">          <i>krep</i><par n="sip/pe__adj"/></e>
